Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4145.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [340A.4015] NURSING HOMES AND ASSISTED LIVING FACILITIES; WHEN LICENSE NOT REQUIRED. new text end new text begin Nothing in this chapter prohibits a nursing home as defined in section 144A.01, subdivision 5, or an assisted living facility as defined in section 144G.08, subdivision 7, from allowing the consumption and display of alcoholic beverages, provided all of the following conditions are met: new text end new text begin (1) the alcoholic beverages are only consumed or displayed by residents of the nursing home or assisted living facility; new text end new text begin (2) residents may only consume or display alcoholic beverages at an activity or event which is resident-focused; new text end new text begin (3) no person under 21 years of age is permitted to consume alcoholic beverages; new text end new text begin (4) any staff serving an alcoholic beverage is at least 18 years of age; and new text end new text begin (5) alcoholic beverages are not offered for sale or otherwise disposed of as part of a commercial transaction. new text end